North Carolina statutes. Chapter 29. Intestate Succession.
Article 5. Legitimated Children.

§ 29-18.
Succession by, through and from legitimated children.

A child born out of wedlock who has been legitimated in accordance with

G.S. 49-10

or 49-12 or in accordance with the applicable law of any other jurisdiction, and the heirs of the child, are entitled by succession to property by, through and from the child’s father and mother and their heirs the same as if born in lawful wedlock; and if the child dies intestate, the child’s property shall descend and be distributed as if the child had been born in lawful wedlock.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5; 2013-198, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, throughout the section, substituted “the child’s” for “his,” or similar language.

Session Laws 2013-198, s. 7, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “out of wedlock who has” for “an illegitimate who shall have” and substituted “the child” for “such child.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Recognition of Foreign Judgments,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 21 (1971).